New York, session 2025-2026, S6068.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7 of the civil service law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. The president of the commission shall collect data on the ethnicity 4 and race of every individual who takes a civil service examination 5 issued or approved by the department and the president shall prepare an 6 annual report describing the data collected. Such report shall be 7 published no later than November thirtieth of each year, beginning in 8 two thousand twenty-seven, and shall report information on the basis of 9 the last completed state fiscal year. The report shall be delivered to 10 the governor and the legislature and shall be made available to the 11 public via the department's website. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10617-02-6